Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB529.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 63SMART GROWTH ZONING AND HOUSING PROGRAMSec.6301. Definitions.6302. Smart Growth Zoning and Housing Program.6303. Submission to department.6304. Requirements.6305. Certificate of compliance.6306. Smart Growth Zoning District Fund.6307. Other discretionary money.123456789101112131415161718 6308. Design standards.6309. Approval of projects.6310. Administration.6311. Repayment.§ 6301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Approved smart growth zoning district." A smart growth zoning district that has been adopted by a municipality and approved by the department in accordance with this chapter and the guidelines of the department, so as to be eligible for the receipt of financial and other incentives."Attainable housing." Housing attainable to and occupied by individuals and families whose annual income is equal to or less than 120% of the areawide median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development."Density bonus payment." A one-time payment to a municipality from the Smart Growth Zoning District Fund or other money authorized by the General Assembly for each housing unit of new construction that is created in a smart growth zoning district."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Developable land area." An area within an approved smart growth zoning district that can be feasibly developed into residential or mixed-use development determined in accordance with guidelines of the department. The term does not include:(1) Land area that is already substantially developed, including existing parks and dedicated, perpetual open space 20250HB0529PN0522 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within a substantially developed portion.(2) Open space designated by the municipality as provided in section 6304 (relating to requirements).(3) Areas exceeding one-half acre of contiguous land that are unsuitable for development because of topographic features or for environmental reasons, such as wetlands."Duplex housing." A residential building with two dwelling units separated by a horizontal or vertical wall."Dwelling unit." A single unit providing complete independent living facilities for one or more individuals, including permanent facilities for cooking, eating, living, sanitation and sleeping."Eligible location." An area that, by virtue of the area's infrastructure, transportation access, existing underutilized facilities or location, makes the area a highly suitable location for residential or mixed-use smart growth zoning districts, including:(1) Areas near transit stations, including rapid transit, commuter rail and bus and ferry terminals.(2) Areas of concentrated development, including town and city centers and other existing commercial districts."Fund." The Smart Growth Zoning District Fund established under section 6306(a) (relating to Smart Growth Zoning District Fund)."Housing production summary." A detailed summary of the municipality's:(1) Attainable housing production history.(2) Housing needs and housing demand assessment.(3) Analysis of development constraints and capacity.(4) Current housing goals and strategy for achieving 20250HB0529PN0522 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 those goals.(5) Proposed locations for attainable housing production."Mixed-use development." A development containing a mix of residential uses and nonresidential uses, including commercial, institutional, industrial or other uses, all conceived, planned and integrated to create vibrant, workable, livable and attractive neighborhoods."Municipality." A city, borough, incorporated town or township or home rule municipality."New construction." Construction of new housing units, the substantial rehabilitation of existing buildings or the conversion to residential use of existing buildings to create additional housing units, to the extent that those units could not have been constructed or converted without the smart growth zoning district."Program." The Smart Growth Zoning and Housing Program established under section 6302 (relating to Smart Growth Zoning and Housing Program)."Project." A proposed residential or mixed-use development within a smart growth zoning district."Smart growth zoning district." A zoning district adopted by a municipality under this chapter that replaces or is superimposed over one or more zoning districts in an eligible location, in accordance with section 6304."Triplex housing." A residential building with three dwelling units separated by a horizontal or vertical wall.§ 6302. Smart Growth Zoning and Housing Program.(a) Establishment.--The Smart Growth Zoning and Housing Program is established within the department for the purpose of 20250HB0529PN0522 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distributing money to a municipality that has adopted by ordinance an approved smart growth zoning district.(b) Creation of district.--By ordinance, a municipality may adopt a smart growth zoning district in an eligible location and may include adjacent areas that are served by existing infrastructure and utilities and that have safe pedestrian access to at least one destination of frequent pedestrian use, such as a school, civic facility, place of commercial or business use, place of employment or recreation or transit station. In a smart growth zoning district, a municipality shall zone for primary residential use as of right and may also permit business, commercial or other uses consistent with primary residential use. A smart growth zoning district ordinance shall be adopted by a majority vote of the governing body of the municipality.(c) Duties of department.--The department shall establish guidelines necessary to implement and administer this chapter.§ 6303. Submission to department.(a) Application.--The department shall develop and prescribe a method for a governing body of a municipality to submit to the department the necessary materials for a determination of approval for the program. The application must:(1) Identify and describe the boundaries of the smart growth zoning district.(2) Identify and describe the developable land area within the smart growth zoning district.(3) Identify and describe other residential development opportunities for infill housing and the residential reuse of existing buildings and underutilized buildings within already developed areas.20250HB0529PN0522 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Include a housing production summary, which shall include an estimate of the projected number of units of new construction that could be built in the smart growth zoning district.(5) Include a copy of the smart growth zoning district ordinance.(6) By narrative and exhibits, establish the elements under section 6304 (relating to requirements).(b) Determination.--(1) The department shall approve an application for the program if the smart growth zoning district meets the requirements under section 6304. If approved, the smart growth zoning district shall be eligible for payments and incentives under section 6306 (relating to Smart Growth Zoning District Fund).(2) If the department denies the application, the department shall inform the applicant of the deficiencies in the application. A governing body of a municipality may reapply for approval after addressing any deficiencies in a prior application.(3) If the department does not make a determination on a complete application within 60 days of receipt, the application shall be deemed approved.(c) Revocation.--The department may revoke approval if the municipality fails to meet the minimum requirements for a smart growth zoning district provided under section 6304.§ 6304. Requirements.(a) Minimum requirements.--A smart growth zoning district shall satisfy the following minimum requirements:(1) Each smart growth zoning district shall be located 20250HB0529PN0522 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in an eligible location.(2) The zoning for each smart growth zoning district shall provide for residential use to permit a mix of housing for families, individuals, persons with special needs and the elderly.(3) Housing density in a smart growth zoning district shall be at least 20 units per acre for multifamily housing on the developable land area, eight units per acre for single-family homes on the developable land area and 12 units per acre for duplex housing and triplex housing on the developable land area.(4) The ordinance for each smart growth zoning district shall provide that not less than 20% of the residential units constructed in projects of more than 12 units shall be attainable housing and shall contain mechanisms to ensure that not less than 20% of the total residential units constructed in each smart growth zoning district shall be attainable housing.(5) A smart growth zoning district shall permit infill housing on existing vacant lots and shall allow the provision of additional housing units in existing buildings, consistent with neighborhood building and use patterns, building codes and fire and safety codes.(6) A smart growth zoning district may not be subject to limitation of the issuance of building permits for residential uses or a local moratorium on the issuance of such permits.(7) A smart growth zoning district may not impose restrictions on age or any other occupancy restrictions on the district as a whole or any portion thereof or project 20250HB0529PN0522 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 therein. Applicants may pursue the development of specific projects within a smart growth zoning district that are exclusively for the elderly, the disabled or for assisted living. The department shall adopt guidelines limiting the percentage of units in the district that qualify the municipality for density bonus payments under section 6306 (relating to Smart Growth Zoning District Fund) that may be subject to restrictions that limit occupancy exclusively for the elderly, the disabled or for assisted living. Not less than 25% of the housing units in a project that limits occupancy exclusively for the elderly, the disabled or for assisted living within a smart growth zoning district shall be attainable housing.(8) Housing in a smart growth zoning district shall comply with Federal, State and local fair housing laws.(9) A smart growth zoning district may not exceed 15% of the total land area in the municipality. Upon request, the department may approve a larger land area if the approval serves the goals and objectives of this chapter.(10) The aggregate land area of all approved smart growth zoning districts in the municipality may not exceed 25% of the total land area in the municipality. The department may approve a larger combined land area if the department determines that the approval serves the goals and objectives of this chapter.(11) Housing density in any smart growth zoning district shall not overburden infrastructure as it exists or may be practicably upgraded in light of anticipated density and other uses to be retained in the district.(12) A smart growth zoning district ordinance shall 20250HB0529PN0522 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 define the manner of review by the municipality in accordance with section 6309 (relating to approval of projects) and shall specify the procedure for review in accordance with guidelines.(b) Open space.--A smart growth zoning district ordinance may modify or eliminate the municipality's dimensional standards in order to support desired densities, mix of uses and physical character. The standards that are subject to modification or waiver may include height, setbacks, lot coverage, parking ratios and locations and roadway design standards. Modified requirements may be applied as of right throughout all or a portion of the smart growth zoning district, or on a project-specific basis through the smart growth zoning district plan review process as provided in the ordinance. A municipality may designate certain areas within a smart growth zoning district as dedicated perpetual open space as defined in section 2(4) of the act of January 19, 1968 (1967 P.L.992, No.442), entitled "An act authorizing the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and the local government units thereof to preserve, acquire or hold land for open space uses." The amount of open space shall not be included as a developable land area within the smart growth zoning district. Open space may include an amount of land equal to up to 10% of what would otherwise be the developable land area if the developable land area would be less than 50 acres and 20% of what would otherwise be the developable land area if the developable land area would be 50 acres or more.(c) Mixed use.--The smart growth zoning district ordinance may provide for mixed-use development subject to any limitations that may be imposed by guidelines of the department.(d) Historic district.--A smart growth zoning district may 20250HB0529PN0522 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 encompass an existing historic district. A municipality, with the approval of the department, may establish a historic district in an approved smart growth zoning district in accordance with the act of June 13, 1961 (P.L.282, No 167), entitled "An act authorizing counties, cities, boroughs, incorporated towns and townships to create historic districts within their geographic boundaries; providing for the appointment of Boards of Historical Architectural Review; empowering governing bodies of political subdivisions to protect the distinctive historical character of these districts and to regulate the erection, reconstruction, alteration, restoration, demolition or razing of buildings within the historic districts," as long as the establishment of the historic district meets the requirements for a historic district and does not render the municipality noncompliant with this chapter, as determined by the department. The historic districts may be coterminous or noncoterminous with the smart growth zoning district. Within any historic district, the requirements of the historic district may apply to existing and proposed buildings.(e) Municipal requirements.--A municipality may require more attainable housing than required by this chapter, both in the percentage of units that must be attainable housing and in the levels of income for which the attainable housing must be accessible, provided that the thresholds may not unduly restrict opportunities for development.(f) Density requirement.--With respect to a municipality with a population of fewer than 10,000, as determined by the most recent Federal decennial census, for hardship shown, the department may, in accordance with guidelines adopted under this chapter, approve zoning for a smart growth zoning district with 20250HB0529PN0522 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lower densities than provided in this chapter if the municipality satisfies the other requirements under this section. Approval may not be withdrawn solely because, in a future census, the population of the municipality exceeds 10,000.(g) Amendment or repeal of ordinance.--Any amendment or repeal of a zoning ordinance affecting an approved smart growth zoning district shall require the municipality to make the payment required under section 6311(b) (relating to repayment). Each amendment or repeal shall be submitted to the department with an evaluation of the effect on the number of projected units that will remain developable, if any, in relation to the number of units that have been built and the number of units that determined any corresponding zoning incentive payment paid to the municipality.(h) Authority.--Nothing in this chapter shall affect a municipality's authority to amend its ordinances.§ 6305. Certificate of compliance.On or before October 1 of each year after the year of approval of a smart growth zoning district by the department, the department shall send a smart growth zoning district certificate of compliance to each municipality with an approved district. In order to receive a certificate, the municipality shall verify within the time specified by the department that:(1) The municipality has adopted an approved smart growth zoning district ordinance.(2) The certification has not been revoked by the department.(3) The smart growth zoning district is being developed in a manner that reasonably complies with the applicable 20250HB0529PN0522 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 minimum requirements in section 6304 (relating to requirements).(4) The municipality has not unreasonably denied plans for projects or has only denied plans for projects in a manner consistent with the municipality's smart growth zoning district ordinance and this chapter.§ 6306. Smart Growth Zoning District Fund.(a) Establishment and purpose of fund.--(1) The Smart Growth Zoning District Fund is established within the State Treasury to provide funding for the program.(2) The General Assembly may appropriate money to the fund from the General Fund for the purpose of awarding incentives and bonus payments through the program.(b) Payments generally.--(1) Payments under this section shall be made subject to available money appropriated by the General Assembly to the fund.(2) Money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the program.(c) Zoning incentive payment.--(1) Each municipality with an approved smart growth zoning district shall be eligible for payments under the program.(2) The Commonwealth shall pay from the fund a zoning incentive payment to municipalities with an approved smart growth zoning district.(3) The payments shall be made according to the following schedule:Projected Units of New Construction Payment20250HB0529PN0522 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Up to 20 $10,000 21 to 100 $75,000 101 to 200 $200,000 201 to 500 $350,000 501 or more $600,000(4) Subject to any conditions imposed by the department as a condition of approving a smart growth zoning district, the zoning incentive payment shall be payable upon confirmation of approval of the smart growth zoning district by the department. The projected number of units shall be based upon the zoning adopted in the smart growth zoning district.(d) Density bonus payments.--(1) The department shall pay from the fund a one-time density bonus payment to each municipality with an approved smart growth zoning district.(2) The density bonus payment shall be $3,000 for each unit of new construction created in the smart growth zoning district.(3) The amount due shall be paid on a unit-by-unit basis in accordance with department guidelines, upon submission by a municipality of proof of issuance of a building permit for a particular housing unit or units within the district.§ 6307. Other discretionary money.When awarding discretionary money to municipalities regarding smart growth and housing that is not paid through the fund, the department, the Department of Environmental Protection and the Department of Transportation shall use a methodology of awarding money that favors municipalities with approved smart growth zoning districts and other approved zoning policies or 20250HB0529PN0522 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 initiatives that encourage increased attainable housing production in this Commonwealth, including inclusionary zoning.§ 6308. Design standards.(a) Adoption.--A municipality may adopt, in accordance with program guidelines, design standards applicable to projects undergoing review by the municipality to ensure that the physical character of development within the smart growth zoning district is complementary to adjacent buildings and structures. The standards must provide for high-density quality development consistent with the character of building types, streetscapes and other municipality features traditionally found in densely settled areas of the municipality or in the region of the municipality.(b) Restrictions.--(1) A municipality may not adopt a design standard if the design standard adds unreasonable costs to residential or mixed-use developments.(2) A design standard may not unreasonably impair the economic feasibility of proposed projects.(3) The department may disapprove a request for a smart growth zoning district because of a design standard that adds unreasonable costs or unreasonably impairs feasibility.§ 6309. Approval of projects.(a) Municipality approval.--A municipality may incorporate provisions within the smart growth zoning district ordinance that prescribe contents of an application for approval of a project. The ordinance may require the applicant to pay for reasonable consulting fees to provide peer review of the applications for the benefit of the municipality, which may be used only for expenses associated with the review of the 20250HB0529PN0522 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development application by outside consultants. Any surplus remaining after the completion of the review, including any interest accrued, shall be returned to the applicant.(b) Zoning.--(1) An application to a municipality for approval under a smart growth zoning district ordinance shall be governed by the applicable zoning provisions in effect at the time of the submission while the plan is being processed and pending any appeal and for three years after approval.(2) If an application is denied, the zoning provisions in effect at the time of the application shall continue in effect with respect to any further application filed within two years after the date of the denial except as the applicant may otherwise choose within that two-year period.(c) Filing and hearing.--(1) An applicant must file an application for approval under this section with the municipal clerk or secretary.(2) A copy of the application for approval under this section, including the date of filing certified by the municipal clerk or secretary, must be filed with the municipality.(3) The municipality shall hold a public hearing for which proper notice has been given.(4) (i) Within 120 days of the receipt of the application for approval under this section by the municipal clerk or secretary, the municipality shall make a decision on the application.(ii) Written notice of the decision under this paragraph must be filed with the municipal clerk or secretary.20250HB0529PN0522 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The required time limits for the action under this paragraph may be extended by written agreement between the applicant and the municipality.(iv) Failure of the municipality to take action within the 120-day period or extended time, if applicable, shall be deemed to be an approval of the plan.(d) Notice and clarification.--(1) The municipality shall issue to the applicant a copy of the decision under subsection (c) that:(i) Contains the name and address of the owner.(ii) Identifies the land affected.(iii) Identifies the plans that were the subject of the decision.(iv) Certifies that:(A) A copy of the decision has been filed with the municipal clerk or secretary.(B) All plans referred to in the decision are on file with the municipality.(2) If 20 days have elapsed after the decision has been filed in the office of the municipal clerk or secretary without an appeal having been filed or if an appeal is dismissed or denied, the municipal clerk or secretary shall so certify on a copy of the decision.(3) If the plan is approved by reason of the failure of the municipality to timely act, the clerk shall make the certification on a copy of the application.(e) Conditions.--A municipality shall approve a project under this section only as necessary to:(1) ensure substantial compliance of the proposed 20250HB0529PN0522 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 project with the requirements of the smart growth zoning district ordinance; or(2) mitigate any extraordinary adverse impacts of the project on nearby properties.(f) Denial.--An application may be denied if:(1) The project does not meet the conditions and requirements under the smart growth zoning district ordinance.(2) The applicant failed to submit information and fees required by the ordinance and necessary for an adequate and timely review of the design of the project or potential project impacts.(3) It is not possible to adequately mitigate extraordinary adverse project impacts on nearby properties by means of suitable conditions.(g) Appeals.--(1) The court of common pleas in the county in which the municipality is located shall hear an appeal of a decision under this section by a party who is aggrieved by the decision.(2) An appeal under this subsection may be brought within 20 days after the decision has been filed in the office of the municipal clerk or secretary.(3) Notice of the appeal under this subsection, with a copy of the complaint, must be given to the municipal clerk or secretary within the 20-day period under paragraph (2).(4) Review shall be based on the record of information and plans presented to the municipality.(h) Validity.--A project approval shall remain valid and shall run with the land indefinitely if construction on the land 20250HB0529PN0522 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 has commenced within two years after the decision is issued, which time shall be extended by the time required to adjudicate an appeal from the approval and if the project proponent is actively pursuing other required permits for the project or there is other good cause for the failure to commence construction, or as may be provided in an approval for a multiphase project.§ 6310. Administration.(a) Duties of department.--The department shall administer the program and annually review and report on the program.(b) Reports.--(1) The department shall undertake or cause to be undertaken an annual review and may require municipalities with smart growth zoning districts to provide data for the preparation of the annual report.(2) Each annual report must:(i) Be prepared on the basis of the data and made available to the general public and submitted to the General Assembly, not later than November 15 of each year, and must cover the status of the program through the end of the prior fiscal year.(ii) Identify and describe the status of municipalities that are actively seeking program approval.(iii) Identify approved smart growth zoning districts and the amounts and anticipated timing of one-time density bonus payments during the prior and current fiscal year.(iv) Summarize the amount of land areas zoned for particular types of projects in both proposed and 20250HB0529PN0522 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approved districts, the number of projects being reviewed by municipalities under section 6309 (relating to approval of projects), including the number and type of proposed residential units, the number of building permits issued and the number of completed housing units and their type, and set out the one-time density bonus payments made to each municipality.(v) For the then-current and the immediately succeeding fiscal years, make estimates for the:(A) Number and size of proposed new districts.(B) Potential number of residential units to be allowed in new districts.(C) Anticipated construction activity.§ 6311. Repayment.(a) Conditions.--(1) If construction of an approved project has not been started in the smart growth zoning district within the time period under paragraph (2), the department shall require the municipalities to repay to the department all money paid to the municipality under this chapter for a smart growth zoning district.(2) Construction must begin within three years of the date of the zoning incentive payment for the smart growth zoning district. This period may be extended by the department for good cause in accordance with the guidelines of the department.(b) Time.--(1) Within 60 days of enacting an amendment or repeal of an ordinance affecting an approved smart growth zoning district in accordance with section 6304(g) (relating to 20250HB0529PN0522 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements), the municipality shall repay to the department any portion of the zoning incentive payment received in excess of the zoning incentive payment that would have been payable based on the sum of the number of units that have been built and the number of units, if any, that will remain developable under the smart growth zoning district.(2) The department may include in the sum under paragraph (1) any units that are developable in one or more adopted smart growth zoning districts for which no zoning incentive payment has been paid but for which the municipality is nonetheless eligible if the associated units would have the effect of replacing some or all of the units that will no longer be developable as a result of the proposed amendment or repeal.(c) Source.--Money repaid to the department under this section shall be credited to the funding source from which the payment originated.Section 2. This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB0529PN0522 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718